Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.180

Cost bond in lieu of security.

In lieu of separate security for each action or proceeding in any court, the plaintiff may cause to be executed and filed in the court a bond in the penal sum of fifty dollars running to the state of Washington, with surety approved by the court, and conditioned for the payment of all judgments for costs which may thereafter be rendered against him or her in that court. Any defendant or garnishee who shall thereafter recover a judgment for costs in said court against the principal on such bond shall likewise be entitled to judgment against the sureties. Such bond shall not be sufficient unless the penalty thereof is unimpaired by any outstanding obligation at the time of the commencement of the action.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3012; 1929 c 102 s 2; RRS s 1777 1/2.]